New Jersey, session 222, S3171.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In addition to the criminal penalties prescribed for a violation of N.J.S.2C:35-5 related to marijuana, any person who is the owner of a business that is not licensed by the Cannabis Regulatory Commission, pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), which manufactures, distributes, or dispenses any quantity of marijuana, shall be guilty of a crime of the third degree. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:1-8 or any other provision of law, a conviction pursuant to this subsection shall not merge with a conviction for a violation of N.J.S.2C:35-5 related to marijuana. b.  A person is a leader of an illegal marijuana business network if the person conspires with others as an organizer, supervisor, financier, or manager to engage for profit in a scheme or course of conduct to unlawfully manufacture, distribute, or dispense marijuana in this State in violation of subsection a. of this section or N.J.S.2C:35-5 at more than one business location.  Any person who is a leader of an illegal marijuana business network is guilty of a crime of the second degree. A person who commits a violation of this subsection shall be subject to the presumption of imprisonment pursuant to subsection d. of N.J.S.2C:44-1. c.     Any person who knowingly purchases marijuana from any owner of a business that is not licensed by the Cannabis Regulatory Commission, pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), and which manufactures, distributes, or dispenses any quantity of marijuana, is guilty of a disorderly persons offense. d.    Upon the discovery of any violation of this section, the New Jersey State Police, in conjunction with the Office of the Attorney General in the Department of Law and Public Safety, may take such necessary steps to close any business which violates the provisions of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) or N.J.S.2C:35-5 and shall seize any marijuana manufactured, distributed, or dispensed in violation of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) or N.J.S.2C:35-5. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.